Maryland, session 2025, HB0663.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
3–505.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0663*

HOUSE BILL 663
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “DISTRIBUTE” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(3) (I) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON” MEANS THAT AN ORDINARY PERSON WOULD
CONCLUDE THAT THE VISUAL REPRESENTATION IS AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON.
(II) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON” INCLUDES A COMPUTER–GENERATED VISUAL
REPRESENTATION THAT HAS BEEN CREATED, ADAPTED, OR MODIFIED TO APPEAR
GENUINE.
(III) “INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON” DOES NOT INCLUDE IMAGES OR ITEMS
DEPICTING A PERSON THAT ARE:
1. DRAWINGS;
2. CARTOONS;
3. SCULPTURES; OR
4. PAINTINGS.
(4) “INTIMATE PARTS” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(5) “SEXUAL ACTIVITY” HAS THE MEANING STATED IN § 3–809 OF THE
CRIMINAL LAW ARTICLE.
(B) A PERSON MAY BRING AND MAINTAIN A CIVIL ACTION FOR DEFAMATION
PER SE AGAINST ANOTHER PERSON WHO DISTRIBUTES A COMPUTER–GENERATED
VISUAL REPRESENTATION THAT IS INDISTINGUISHABLE FROM AN ACTUAL VISUAL
REPRESENTATION OF THE PERSON AND FALSELY DEPICTS THE PERSON WITH HIS OR
HER INTIMATE PARTS EXPOSED OR ENGAGED IN SEXUAL ACTIVITY.
(C) THE COURT MAY AWARD A PREVAILING PLAINTIFF IN AN ACTION UNDER
THIS SECTION:
(1) PUNITIVE DAMAGES;

HOUSE BILL 663 3
(2) ATTORNEY’S FEES; AND
(3) INJUNCTIVE RELIEF FROM ALL PARTIES INVOLVED IN THE
VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION.
Article – Criminal Law
3–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Distribute” means to give, sell, transfer, disseminate, publish, upload,
circulate, broadcast, make available, allow access to, or engage in any other form of
transmission, electronic or otherwise.
(3) “Harm” means:
(i) physical injury;
(ii) serious emotional distress; or
(iii) economic damages.
(4) “Intimate parts” means the naked genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or
female nipple.
(5) “Sexual activity” means:
(i) sexual intercourse, including genital–genital, oral–genital,
anal–genital, or oral–anal;
(ii) masturbation; or
(iii) sadomasochistic abuse.
(6) “VISUAL REPRESENTATION” INCLUDES A PHOTOGRAPH, A FILM,
A VIDEO, A DIGITAL IMAGE, A PICTURE, OR A COMPUTER–GENERATED IMAGE OR
PICTURE, WHETHER MADE OR PRODUCED BY ELECTRONIC, MECHANICAL, OR OTHER
MEANS.
(b) (1) This sections does not apply to:
(i) lawful and common practices of law enforcement, the reporting
of unlawful conduct, or legal proceedings; or

HOUSE BILL 663
(ii) situations involving voluntary exposure in public or commercial
settings.
(2) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. § 230(f)(2), is
not liable under this section for content provided by another person.
(c) A person may not knowingly distribute a visual representation of another
identifiable person that displays the other person with his or her intimate parts exposed or
while engaged in an act of sexual activity:
(1) with the intent to harm, harass, intimidate, threaten, or coerce the
other person;
(2) (i) under circumstances in which the person knew that the other
person did not consent to the distribution; or
(ii) with reckless disregard as to whether the person consented to the
distribution; and
(3) under circumstances in which the other person had a reasonable
expectation that the image would remain private.
(d) A person who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction
is subject to imprisonment net exceeding 2 years or a fine not exceeding $5,000 or both.
(e) A person who violates this section is subject to § 5–106(b) of the Courts Article.
(f) (1) A PERSON WHOSE VISUAL REPRESENTATION WAS DISTRIBUTED
IN VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION HAS A CIVIL CAUSE OF ACTION AGAINST ANY PERSON
WHO DISTRIBUTED THE VISUAL REPRESENTATION.
(2) IN AN ACTION UNDER THIS SUBSECTION, THE COURT MAY AWARD
ACTUAL DAMAGES AND REASONABLE ATTORNEY’S FEES.
(G) A visual representation of a victim that is part of a court record for a case
arising [from a prosecution] under this section:
(1) subject to item (2) of this subsection, may not be made available for
public inspection; and
(2) except as otherwise ordered by the court, may only be made available
for inspection in relation to a criminal charge OR CIVIL ACTION under this section to:
(i) court personnel;
(ii) a jury in a criminal case brought under this section;

HOUSE BILL 663 5
(iii) the State’s Attorney or the State’s Attorney’s designee;
(iv) the Attorney General or the Attorney General’s designee;
(v) a law enforcement officer;
(vi) THE PLAINTIFF OR THE PLAINTIFF’S ATTORNEY;
(VII) the defendant or the defendant’s attorney; or
[(vii)] (VIII) the victim or the victim’s attorney.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.